Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-179
Scotts Bluff.

The county of Scotts Bluff is bounded as follows: Commencing at the northeast corner of section five, in township twenty-three, north, of range fifty-two, west, of the sixth principal meridian; thence west by township lines to a point where the said line intersects the west boundary line of the State of Nebraska; thence south along the west boundary line of the State of Nebraska to a point on the section line between sections eighteen and nineteen, in township twenty, north, of range fifty-eight, west; thence due east on said section line to the southeast corner of section thirteen, in township twenty, north, of range fifty-three, west; thence north on the range line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three, west to the northeast corner of section one, in township twenty, north, of range fifty-three, west; thence east to the southeast corner of section thirty-two, in township twenty-one, north, of range fifty-two, west; and thence due north to the place of beginning.

Formed from Cheyenne County pursuant to Laws 1879, § 10, p. 355, by vote of electors Nov. 6, 1888;

R.S.1913, § 894;

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 10, p. 827;

C.S.1922, § 796;

C.S.1929, § 25-183;

R.S.1943, § 22-179.